Utah statutes.
9-4-506.   Allotment accounts.
(1)  There are created the following allotment accounts:
(a)  the Single Family Housing Account, for which eligible issuing authorities
are those authorized under the code and state statute to issue qualified
mortgage bonds under Section 143 of the code;
(b)  the Student Loan Account, for which eligible issuing authorities are
those authorized under the code and state statute to issue qualified student
loan bonds under Section 144(b) of the code;
(c)  the Small Issue Bond Account, for which eligible issuing authorities are
those authorized under the code and state statute to issue:
(i)  qualified small issue bonds under Section 144(a) of the code; or
(ii)  qualified exempt facility bonds for qualified residential rental
projects under Section 142(d) of the code;
(d)  the Exempt Facilities Account, for which eligible issuing authorities are
those authorized under the code and state statute to issue bonds requiring an
allocation of volume cap other than for purposes described in Subsections
(1)(a), (b), or (c);
(e)  the Pool Account, for which eligible issuing authorities are those
authorized under the code and state statute to issue bonds requiring an
allocation of volume cap; and
(f)  the Carryforward Account, for which eligible issuing authorities are
those with projects or programs qualifying under Section 146(f) of the code.
(2) (a)  The volume cap shall be distributed to the various allotment accounts
on January 1 of each year on the following basis:
(i) 42% to the Single Family Housing Account;
(ii)  33% to the Student Loan Account;
(iii)  1% to the Exempt Facilities Account; and
(iv) 24% to the Small Issue Bond Account.
(b)  From July 1 to September 30 of each year, the board of review may
transfer any unallocated volume cap from the Exempt Facilities Account or the
Small Issue Bond Account to the Pool Account.
(c)  The board of review, upon written notification by the issuing authorities
eligible for volume cap allocation from the Single Family Housing Account or
the Student Loan Account that all or a portion of volume cap distributed into
that allotment account will not be used, may transfer the unused volume cap
between the Single Family Housing Account and the Student Loan Account.
(d)  From October 1 to the third Friday of December of each year, all
unallocated volume cap shall be transferred into the Pool Account.
(e)  Unallocated volume cap or allocated volume cap for which bonds have not
been issued prior to the third Saturday of December shall be transferred on
that date into the Carryforward Account.
(f)  If the authority to issue bonds designated in any allotment account is
rescinded by amendment to the code, the board of review may transfer any
unallocated volume cap from that allotment account to any other allotment
account.
